District of Columbia statutes.
7-651.10

Training and education.

The Mayor shall provide training for EMS personnel on the implementation of this chapter and initiate and participate in programs designed to educate the public with respect to this chapter.

History

Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-224, § 11, 48 DCR 27